Ohio, session 136, HB897.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 2151.282 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 2151.282. (A) As used in this section, "child advocate" includes any court-appointed special advocate or victim advocate appointed or employed to assist the court in determining what is in a minor child's best interest. (B) Not later than one hundred twenty days after the effective date of this section, each guardian ad litem and child advocate appointed in a proceeding under this chapter or Chapter 2152. of the Revised Code shall complete at least three hours of trauma-informed care training every two years, in addition to any other continuing education required under rules adopted by the Ohio supreme court. The trauma-informed care training shall include the following topics: (1) The effects of trauma on child development, attachment, cognition, behavior, and emotional regulation; (2) Conducting meetings and interviews with a child and representing a child in a trauma-sensitive manner to avoid retraumatization of the child; (3) Recognizing secondary or vicarious trauma in the guardian ad litem's or child advocate's own self. (B) The Ohio supreme court's commission on continuing legal education may recognize the hours required under this section toward the number of continuing legal education hours required for attorneys. (C) The Ohio supreme court may approve organizations or providers for qualified trauma-informed care training, including nonprofit organizations, legal aid organizations, universities, and certified trauma care agencies. (D) Not later than one hundred twenty days after the effective date of this section, a guardian ad litem or child advocate appointed in a proceeding under this chapter or Chapter 2152. of the Revised Code shall demonstrate compliance with the training requirements under this section.